Washington statutes.
RCW 43.210.020

Small business export finance assistance center authorized—Purposes.

A nonprofit corporation, to be known as the small business export finance assistance center, and branches subject to its authority, may be formed under chapter 24.03A RCW for the following public purposes:

(1) To assist small and medium-sized businesses in both urban and rural areas in the financing of export transactions.

(2) To provide, singly or in conjunction with other organizations, information and assistance to these businesses about export opportunities and financing alternatives.

[ 2021 c 176 s 5224; 1998 c 109 s 1; 1990 1st ex.s. c 17 s 66; 1985 c 231 s 2; 1983 1st ex.s. c 20 s 2.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 176: See note following RCW 24.03A.005.

Intent—1990 1st ex.s. c 17: See note following RCW 43.210.010.

Severability—Part, section headings not law—1990 1st ex.s. c 17: See RCW 36.70A.900 and 36.70A.901.

Transfer of property—1985 c 231: "All reports, documents, surveys, books, records, files, papers, or written material in the possession of the export assistance center shall be delivered to the custody of the small business export finance assistance center. All cabinets, furniture, office equipment, motor vehicles, and other tangible property employed by the export assistance center shall be made available to the small business export finance assistance center. All funds, credits, or other assets held by the export assistance center shall be assigned to the small business export finance assistance center.

Whenever any question arises as to the transfer of any funds, books, documents, records, papers, files, equipment, or other tangible property used or held in the exercise of the powers and the performance of the duties and functions transferred, the director of financial management shall make a determination as to the proper allocation and certify the same to the state agencies concerned." [ 1985 c 231 s 7.]

Existing contracts—1985 c 231: "All existing contracts and obligations shall remain in full force and shall be performed by the small business export finance assistance center." [ 1985 c 231 s 8.]

Savings—1985 c 231: "The transfer of the powers, duties, and functions of the export assistance center shall not affect the validity of any act performed prior to May 10, 1985." [ 1985 c 231 s 9.]